Wisconsin, session 2025, SB259.
do enact as follows:SB259,11Section 1. 48.981 (3) (c) 2r. of the statutes is created to read:SB259,2,9248.981 (3) (c) 2r. If an agency initiates an investigation under subd. 1. a. 3pertaining to a child or unborn child and the agency knows or has reason to know 4that a parent of the child or unborn child is a member of the U.S. armed forces, a 5reserve component of the U.S. armed forces, or the Wisconsin national guard, the 6agency shall provide notice to the appropriate authorities of the U.S. department of 7defense within 24 hours of initiating the investigation. The notice shall consist only 8of the name and address of the child or expectant mother and the fact that an 9investigation has been initiated about that child or unborn child.SB259,210Section 2. 48.981 (7) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB259,2,141148.981 (7) (a) (intro.) All reports made under this section, notices provided 12under sub. (3) (bm) and (c) 2r., and records maintained by an agency and other 13persons, officials, and institutions shall be confidential. Reports and records may 14be disclosed only to the following persons:SB259,2,1515